isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX GZ Y 63
SFX GZ ti l .
SFX GZ ti la .
SFX GZ ti lo .
SFX GZ ti li .
SFX GZ nuti u .
SFX GZ nuti em .
SFX GZ nuti eš .
SFX GZ nuti e .
SFX GZ nuti emo .
SFX GZ nuti ete .
SFX GZ nuti ut .
SFX GZ ti h .
SFX GZ ti še .
SFX GZ ti hmo .
SFX GZ ti ste .
SFX GZ ti hu .
SFX GZ nuti i .
SFX GZ nuti imo .
SFX GZ nuti ite .
SFX GZ nuti uči .
SFX GZ nuti učego .
SFX GZ nuti učemu .
SFX GZ nuti učim .
SFX GZ nuti učem .
SFX GZ nuti učih .
SFX GZ nuti učimi .
SFX GZ nuti uča .
SFX GZ nuti uču .
SFX GZ nuti učej .
SFX GZ nuti učeju .
SFX GZ nuti uče .
SFX GZ nuti omy .
SFX GZ nuti omogo .
SFX GZ nuti omomu .
SFX GZ nuti omym .
SFX GZ nuti omom .
SFX GZ nuti omo .
SFX GZ nuti oma .
SFX GZ nuti omu .
SFX GZ nuti omoj .
SFX GZ nuti omoju .
SFX GZ nuti omi .
SFX GZ nuti ome .
SFX GZ nuti omyh .
SFX GZ nuti omym .
SFX GZ nuti omymi .
SFX GZ nuti omo .
SFX GZ ti vši .
SFX GZ ti všego .
SFX GZ ti všemu .
SFX GZ ti všim .
SFX GZ ti všem .
SFX GZ ti vših .
SFX GZ ti všimi .
SFX GZ ti vša .
SFX GZ ti všu .
SFX GZ ti všej .
SFX GZ ti všeju .
SFX GZ ti vše .
SFX GZ i y .
SFX GZ i a .
SFX GZ i o .
SFX GZ i je .

SFX Ga Y 64
SFX Ga  se 0 .
SFX Ga ti se l .
SFX Ga ti se la .
SFX Ga ti se lo .
SFX Ga ti se li .
SFX Ga nuti se u .
SFX Ga nuti se em .
SFX Ga nuti se eš .
SFX Ga nuti se e .
SFX Ga nuti se emo .
SFX Ga nuti se ete .
SFX Ga nuti se ut .
SFX Ga ti se h .
SFX Ga ti se še .
SFX Ga ti se hmo .
SFX Ga ti se ste .
SFX Ga ti se hu .
SFX Ga nuti se i .
SFX Ga nuti se imo .
SFX Ga nuti se ite .
SFX Ga nuti se uči .
SFX Ga nuti se učego .
SFX Ga nuti se učemu .
SFX Ga nuti se učim .
SFX Ga nuti se učem .
SFX Ga nuti se učih .
SFX Ga nuti se učimi .
SFX Ga nuti se uča .
SFX Ga nuti se uču .
SFX Ga nuti se učej .
SFX Ga nuti se učeju .
SFX Ga nuti se uče .
SFX Ga nuti se omy .
SFX Ga nuti se omogo .
SFX Ga nuti se omomu .
SFX Ga nuti se omym .
SFX Ga nuti se omom .
SFX Ga nuti se omo .
SFX Ga nuti se oma .
SFX Ga nuti se omu .
SFX Ga nuti se omoj .
SFX Ga nuti se omoju .
SFX Ga nuti se omi .
SFX Ga nuti se ome .
SFX Ga nuti se omyh .
SFX Ga nuti se omym .
SFX Ga nuti se omymi .
SFX Ga nuti se omo .
SFX Ga ti se vši .
SFX Ga ti se všego .
SFX Ga ti se všemu .
SFX Ga ti se všim .
SFX Ga ti se všem .
SFX Ga ti se vših .
SFX Ga ti se všimi .
SFX Ga ti se vša .
SFX Ga ti se všu .
SFX Ga ti se všej .
SFX Ga ti se všeju .
SFX Ga ti se vše .
SFX Ga i se y .
SFX Ga i se a .
SFX Ga i se o .
SFX Ga i se je .

SFX Gb Y 80
SFX Gb ti l .
SFX Gb ti la .
SFX Gb ti lo .
SFX Gb ti li .
SFX Gb skakati u .
SFX Gb skakati em .
SFX Gb skakati eš .
SFX Gb skakati e .
SFX Gb skakati emo .
SFX Gb skakati ete .
SFX Gb skakati ut .
SFX Gb ti h .
SFX Gb ti še .
SFX Gb ti hmo .
SFX Gb ti ste .
SFX Gb ti hu .
SFX Gb skakati j .
SFX Gb skakati jmo .
SFX Gb skakati jte .
SFX Gb skakati juči .
SFX Gb skakati jučego .
SFX Gb skakati jučemu .
SFX Gb skakati jučim .
SFX Gb skakati jučem .
SFX Gb skakati jučih .
SFX Gb skakati jučimi .
SFX Gb skakati juča .
SFX Gb skakati juču .
SFX Gb skakati jučej .
SFX Gb skakati jučeju .
SFX Gb skakati juče .
SFX Gb skakati emy .
SFX Gb skakati emogo .
SFX Gb skakati emomu .
SFX Gb skakati emym .
SFX Gb skakati emom .
SFX Gb skakati emo .
SFX Gb skakati ema .
SFX Gb skakati emu .
SFX Gb skakati emoj .
SFX Gb skakati emoju .
SFX Gb skakati emi .
SFX Gb skakati eme .
SFX Gb skakati emyh .
SFX Gb skakati emym .
SFX Gb skakati emymi .
SFX Gb ti vši .
SFX Gb ti všego .
SFX Gb ti všemu .
SFX Gb ti všim .
SFX Gb ti všem .
SFX Gb ti vših .
SFX Gb ti všimi .
SFX Gb ti vša .
SFX Gb ti všu .
SFX Gb ti všej .
SFX Gb ti všeju .
SFX Gb ti vše .
SFX Gb ti ny .
SFX Gb ti nogo .
SFX Gb ti nomu .
SFX Gb ti nym .
SFX Gb ti nom .
SFX Gb ti ni .
SFX Gb ti ne .
SFX Gb ti nyh .
SFX Gb ti nymi .
SFX Gb ti na .
SFX Gb ti nu .
SFX Gb ti noj .
SFX Gb ti noju .
SFX Gb ti no .
SFX Gb ti nje .
SFX Gb ti nja .
SFX Gb ti nju .
SFX Gb ti njem .
SFX Gb ti nij .
SFX Gb ti njam .
SFX Gb ti njami .
SFX Gb ti njah .

SFX Gc Y 28
SFX Gc  naděje 0 .
SFX Gc y naděje o .
SFX Gc y naděje a .
SFX Gc y naděje ogo .
SFX Gc y naděje u .
SFX Gc y naděje oj .
SFX Gc y naděje om .
SFX Gc y naděje omu .
SFX Gc  naděje m .
SFX Gc y naděje oju .
SFX Gc y naděje i .
SFX Gc y naděje e .
SFX Gc  naděje h .
SFX Gc  naděje mi .
SFX Gc y naděje ějši/zz .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšego .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšemu .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšim .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšem .
SFX Gc y naděje ějše .
SFX Gc y naděje ějša .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšu .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšej .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšeju .
SFX Gc y naděje ějših .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšim .
SFX Gc y naděje ějšimi .
SFX Gc y naděje ěje/zz .
